Tennessee, session 114, HB0709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-703, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) If a local board of education declares the board's LEA to be a high
performing school district pursuant to subsection (a), then the board shall notify the
department of education of the local board's declaration. The department shall publish a
list of LEAs that are high performing school districts pursuant to this section on the
department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0709
001968
- 1 -